Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-511.03
Possession of security device countermeasure;
penalty.

(1)
It shall be unlawful for any person, other than an authorized agent of a store
or retail establishment, to possess, in that store, any security device countermeasure.

(2) For purposes
of this section, security device countermeasure means a device which bypasses,
disables, or removes an electronic or magnetic theft alarm sensor.

(3) Any person
violating this section is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2010, LB894, § 3.